src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-14pereh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pereh: # Noun (14RITSʼKAS =>PEREH) pereh 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     pereh+N+Sg+Nom: pereh
     pereh+N+Sg+Gen: perre
     pereh+N+Sg+Par: pereht
     pereh+N+Sg+Ill: perrehe
     pereh+N+Sg+Ine: perren
     pereh+N+Sg+Ela: perrest
     pereh+N+Sg+All: perrele
     pereh+N+Sg+Ade: perrel
     pereh+N+Sg+Abl: perrelt
     pereh+N+Sg+Tra: perres
     pereh+N+Sg+Ter: perreniq
     pereh+N+Sg+Abe: perreldäq
     pereh+N+Sg+Com: perregaq
     pereh+N+Pl+Nom: perreq
     pereh+N+Pl+Gen: perride
     pereh+N+Pl+Par: perrit
     pereh+N+Pl+Ill: perrihe
     pereh+N+Pl+Ine: perrin
     pereh+N+Pl+Ela: perrist
     pereh+N+Pl+All: perrile
     pereh+N+Pl+Ade: perril
     pereh+N+Pl+Abl: perrilt
     pereh+N+Pl+Tra: perris
     pereh+N+Pl+Ter: perriniq
     pereh+N+Pl+Abe: perrildäq
     pereh+N+Pl+Com: perridegaq
